foma/sakha_min.lexc
!!!sakha.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +pos +N +num +sg +pl +case +nom +acc +part +dat +abl +ins +com +cmpr  +ycheck case.acc. @P.CaseAcc.ON@

LEXICON Root

N ;

LEXICON N
!!!GUESS+^NOUNGUESS:0^NOUNGUESS Nstem;
taba Nstem;
balyk Nstem;

LEXICON Nstem

+pos+N:^ Ninfl;

LEXICON Ninfl

+num+sg:0 Ncase;
+num+pl:lar^ Ncase;

LEXICON Ncase

+case+nom:0 NPossNom;
!@P.CaseAcc.ON@+case+acc:@P.CaseAcc.ON@y^ #;
+case+acc:case.acc.y^ #;
+case+part:ta^ #;
+case+dat:ga^ #;
+case+abl:tan^ #;
+case+ins:nan^ #;
+case+ycheck:y^ #;
